North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-43.2 Special Fuels and Importer for Use Taxes
57-43.2-11.
Report by refiner, supplier, distributor, retailer, importer, or exporter required.

A refiner, supplier, distributor, retailer, importer, or exporter shall file a monthly report with the commissioner no later than the twenty-fifth day of each calendar month covering special fuel sold and used during the preceding calendar month. When the twenty-fifth day of the calendar month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the due date is the first working day after the Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. When the report is filed by mail, the report is timely if the envelope containing the report is postmarked by the United States postal service or other postal carrier service before midnight of the due date. The commissioner may require separate reports to be filed covering liquefied petroleum gases.

The report to the commissioner must be on a form prescribed and furnished by the commissioner. The commissioner may require that all or part of the report be submitted in an electronic format approved by the commissioner, provided the person required to file the report is able to use an electronic format. The report must contain such information as required by the commissioner, including:

A detailed schedule of special fuel refined, purchased, imported, and exported.

A detailed schedule of special fuel sold to a person eligible to purchase the special fuel without the tax imposed by this chapter.

A detailed schedule of special fuel sold tax-paid to a person for resale, including a list of persons who purchased the special fuel for resale.

The total number of gallons of special fuel sold and used subject to tax imposed by this chapter.

The number of gallons of special fuel sold tax-exempt to a qualified consumer.

The number of gallons of special fuel in physical inventory at the beginning of the calendar month, the number of gallons in physical inventory at the close of the calendar month, and any gains or losses experienced.

The report must be signed by the taxpayer to be valid and must contain a written declaration that it is made and subscribed under penalties of perjury. The tax commissioner may prescribe alternative methods for signing, subscribing, or verifying a report filed by electronic means, including telecommunications, that shall have the same validity and consequence as the actual signature and written declaration for a paper return.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 722, § 10; 1989, ch. 727, § 11; 1999, ch. 526, § 46; 2007, ch. 539, § 3.

57-43.2-11.1.
Report by terminal operator required.

A terminal operator shall file a monthly report with the commissioner no later than the twenty-fifth day of each calendar month covering special fuel received into and removed from the terminal during the preceding calendar month. When the twenty-fifth day of the calendar month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the due date is the first working day after the Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. When the report is filed by mail, the report is timely if the envelope containing the report is postmarked by the United States postal service or other postal carrier service before midnight of the due date.

The report to the commissioner must be on a form prescribed and furnished by the commissioner or in a format approved by the commissioner. The commissioner may require that all or part of the report be submitted in an electronic format approved by the commissioner, provided the terminal operator is able to file the report in an electronic format. The report must contain such information as required by the commissioner and may include:

A detailed schedule of special fuel received into the terminal for or on behalf of the position holder.

A detailed schedule of special fuel removed from the terminal by or on behalf of a position holder.

The number of gallons of special fuel in inventory at the beginning of the calendar month and the number of gallons in inventory at the close of the calendar month for each position holder.

The report must be signed by the taxpayer to be valid and must contain a written declaration that it is made under penalties of perjury. The tax commissioner may prescribe alternative methods for signing, subscribing, or verifying a return filed by electronic means, including telecommunications, that shall have the same validity and consequence as the actual signature and written declaration for a paper return.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 47.

57-43.2-11.2.
Common or contract carrier — License required — Records required — Diverted loads — Commissioner to audit records.

A common or contract carrier shall obtain a license issued by the commissioner. The application for license must be made on a form prescribed by the commissioner and contain the information required by the commissioner.

A common or contract carrier transporting special fuel in a vehicle, railcar, or vessel into this state from another state or country shall ensure that a bill of lading indicating North Dakota as the destination state has been issued by the terminal or bulk plant from which the fuel was removed. If a bill of lading issued by the terminal or bulk plant indicates a destination other than North Dakota, the transporter shall issue a diversion ticket indicating North Dakota as the destination state. If a bill of lading was not issued by the terminal or bulk plant, the transporter shall issue a bill of lading for each shipment indicating North Dakota as the destination state. A copy of a diversion ticket and bill of lading prepared by the transporter shall be mailed, faxed, or electronically transmitted to the commissioner before the fuel enters the state.

A common or contract carrier transporting special fuel in the state shall provide a copy of the bill of lading accompanying the shipment, along with any drop load tickets and diversion tickets issued for the delivered fuel to the refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, retailer, or consumer to whom delivery of the shipment was made.

A refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, retailer, or consumer may not knowingly accept delivery of special fuel into storage facilities in this state if that delivery is not accompanied by a bill of lading or diversion ticket issued by the terminal operator, bulk plant operator, or transporter, which specifically indicates North Dakota as the destination state of the special fuel.

If a common or contract carrier unloads only a portion of a shipment at a location or if the load is loaded at a location other than what is indicated in the bill of lading or diversion ticket, the transporter shall issue a drop load ticket. If the fuel is dropped at more than one location, the drop load ticket must identify the name and address of all locations and the type of fuel and gallonage dropped. A copy of the ticket must be maintained on board and a copy must accompany the bill of lading that is provided to the refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, retailer, or consumer taking delivery of the fuel.

A diversion ticket must include the following information:

The transporter’s name and address.

The date and time of issuance.

The diversion ticket number.

The name and address of the consignee indicated on the original bill of lading.

The destination as stated on the original bill of lading.

The original bill of lading number.

The location diverted to, including the address to which the fuel was diverted and the destination state.

The number of gallons of fuel being diverted.

The type of fuel being diverted.

Any other information required by the commissioner.

A drop load ticket must include the following:

The transporter’s name and address.

The date and time of issuance.

The partial load ticket number.

The name and address of the consignee indicated on the original bill of lading.

The destination on the original bill of lading as shown on the diversion ticket, if issued.

The original bill of lading number and, if available, the diversion ticket number.

The number of gallons off-loaded at each location.

The type of fuel off-loaded at each location.

Any other information required by the commissioner.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the commissioner may audit the records of the common or contract carrier, whether or not licensed by the commissioner, and may impose such penalties as authorized by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 48.

57-43.2-12.
Monthly returns and payments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-13.
Presumption. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-14.
Commissioner to audit report and assess tax.

The commissioner, or an authorized representative, may audit the records, books, and papers and examine fuel and any equipment used to store, transport, or dispense fuel, of a refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, exporter, terminal operator, retailer, or common or contract carrier. For a person required to file a report, the examination and audit must be done no later than three years after the due date of the report or three years after the report was filed, whichever period expires later. The commissioner is authorized to make assessments of tax, plus penalty and interest, or to issue credits or refunds as determined on the basis of the examination and audit.

If it is determined upon audit that the tax due was twenty-five percent or more above the amount reported on a report, the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for the collection of the tax may be begun without such assessment, at any time within six years after the due date of the return, or six years after the return was filed, whichever period expires later.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commissioner may audit any consumer’s claim for refund and, not later than three years after the due date of a claim or three years after the claim was filed, whichever period expires later, assess additional tax or issue an additional refund. If additional tax is found due or if an additional tax refund applies, the commissioner shall notify the claimant in detail of the reason for the increase or decrease. For any claim selected for audit, the claimant shall provide additional verification as required by the commissioner of fuel purchases, payment of the tax, use of the fuel for a purpose entitling the claimant to a refund, and use of the fuel other than in a licensed motor vehicle.

If a person gives false or fraudulent information in a report or in a claim for refund, or if the failure by a person to file a tax report is due to the fraudulent intent or the willful attempt of the person in any manner to evade the tax, the time limitations in this section do not apply, and the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for the collection of the tax may be begun without the assessment, at any time.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in this chapter for the assessment of tax, the commissioner and the person consent in writing to an extension of time for the assessment of the tax, the tax may be assessed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

A determination of additional tax due issued to a person fixes the tax finally and irrevocably unless the person against whom it is assessed, within thirty days after the giving of notice of the determination, protests the determination under rules adopted by the commissioner and in the manner provided in chapter 28-32.

A determination that a claim for a tax credit or refund is disallowed becomes finally and irrevocably fixed unless the person claiming the refund, within thirty days after the giving of notice of the determination, protests the determination under rules adopted by the commissioner and in the manner provided in chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1991, ch. 688, § 11; 1993, ch. 573, § 3; 1997, ch. 498, § 17; 1999, ch. 526, § 49.

57-43.2-14.1.
Determination if no report is filed.

If a person fails, neglects, or refuses to file a special fuel tax report when due, the commissioner shall, on the basis of available information, determine the tax liability for the period during which no report was filed, and to the tax thus determined the commissioner shall add the penalty and interest as provided in section 57-43.2-15. An assessment made by the commissioner under this section or section 57-43.2-14 is presumed to be correct, and in any case when the validity of the assessment is in question, the burden is on the person who challenges the assessment to establish by fair preponderance of evidence that it is erroneous or excessive.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 50.

57-43.2-15.
Penalty and interest — Violations.

If a person fails to file the required report or to pay the full amount of the tax as required by this chapter, there is imposed a penalty of five dollars or a sum equal to five percent of the tax due, whichever is greater, with interest at the rate of one percent per month on the tax due, for each calendar month or fraction of a month during which the delinquency continues, excepting the month within which the tax became due. If a person files a false or fraudulent report with intent to evade the tax imposed by this chapter, there is imposed a penalty equal to ten percent of the deficiency, with interest at the rate of two percent per month on the deficiency, for each calendar month or fraction of a month during which the deficiency continues.

If a consumer fails to pay any tax due under this chapter, the commissioner shall impose a penalty of five dollars or a sum equal to five percent of the tax due, whichever is greater, together with interest at the rate of one percent per month on the tax due, for each calendar month or fraction of a month during which the delinquency continues, not including the month within which the tax became due. The commissioner, for good cause shown, may waive all or part of the penalty or the interest provided by this subsection. No refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, exporter, or retailer may be held liable for taxes due directly from a consumer.

A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if:

The person refuses or knowingly or intentionally fails to make and file any report required by this chapter in the manner or within the time required; or

The person knowingly or with intent to evade or aid in the evasion of the tax imposed by this chapter makes any false statement or conceals any material fact in any application, record, report, or claim for refund provided for in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1989, ch. 727, § 12; 1993, ch. 573, § 4; 1999, ch. 526, § 51.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

57-43.2-16.
Determination if no return made. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-16.1.
Corporate officer liability.

If a corporation holding a license issued under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the president, vice president, secretary, or treasurer, jointly or severally, having control or supervision of, or charged with the responsibility for making such returns and payments, is personally liable for the failure. The dissolution of a corporation does not discharge an officer’s liability for a prior failure of the corporation to make a return or remit the tax due. The sum due for such a liability may be assessed and collected under the provisions of this chapter for the assessment and collection of other liabilities.

If the corporate officers elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the corporation must be required to make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual special fuel tax liability of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 553, § 5; 1999, ch. 509, § 10.

57-43.2-16.2.
Governor and manager liability.

If a limited liability company holding a license issued under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the taxes due under this chapter, the governors, managers, or members of a member-controlled limited liability company, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility of supervising the preparation of the returns and payments are personally liable for the failure. The dissolution of a limited liability company does not discharge a governor’s, manager’s, or member’s liability for a prior failure of the limited liability company to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the governors, managers, or members elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability company must be required to make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual special fuel tax liability of the limited liability company.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 102; 1995, ch. 103, § 79; 1999, ch. 509, § 11; 2001, ch. 521, § 7.

57-43.2-16.3.
Lien of tax — Collection — Action authorized.

When a taxpayer liable to pay a tax or penalty imposed refuses or neglects to pay the tax, the amount, including any interest, penalty, or addition to the tax, together with the costs that may accrue in addition to the tax, is a lien in favor of the state of North Dakota upon all property and rights to property, whether real or personal, belonging to the taxpayer, and in the case of property in which a deceased taxpayer held an interest as joint tenant or otherwise with right of survivorship at the time of death, the lien continues as a lien against the property in the hands of the survivors to the extent of the deceased taxpayer’s interest therein, which interest is determined by dividing the value of the entire property at the time of the taxpayer’s death by the number of joint tenants or persons interested therein.

The lien attaches at the time the tax becomes due and payable and continues until the liability for the amount is satisfied. For the purposes of this section, the words “due” and “due and payable” mean the first instant at which the tax becomes due.

Any mortgagee, purchaser, judgment creditor, or lien claimant acquiring any interest in, or lien on, any property situated in the state, prior to the commissioner filing in the central indexing system maintained by the secretary of state a notice of the lien provided for in this section, takes free of, or has priority over, the lien.

The commissioner shall index in the central indexing system the following data:

The name of the taxpayer.

The name “State of North Dakota” as claimant.

The date and time the notice of lien was indexed.

The amount of the lien.

The internal revenue service taxpayer identification number or social security number of the taxpayer.

The commissioner is exempt from the payment of the filing fees as otherwise provided by law for the filing of a lien or the satisfaction of a lien.

Upon payment of the tax as to which the commissioner has indexed notice in the central indexing system, the commissioner shall index a satisfaction of the lien in the central indexing system.

Upon the request of the commissioner, the attorney general shall bring an action at law or in equity, as the facts may justify, without bond to enforce payment of any taxes and any penalties, or to foreclose the lien in the manner provided for mortgages on real or personal property, and in the action the attorney general shall have the assistance of the state’s attorney of the county in which the action is pending.

The foregoing remedies of the state are cumulative and no action taken by the commissioner or attorney general may be construed to be an election on the part of the state or any of its officers to pursue any remedy hereunder to the exclusion of any other remedy provided by law.

The notice of lien is effective as of eight a.m. next following the indexing of the notice. Any notice of lien filed by the commissioner may be indexed in the central indexing system without changing its original priority as to property in the county where the lien was filed.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 553, § 6; 1995, ch. 548, § 8; 1997, ch. 478, § 8; 1999, ch. 313, § 12; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2011, ch. 456, § 12; 2013, ch. 257, § 43; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

57-43.2-16.4.
Liability of a general partner in a limited liability limited partnership.

If a limited liability limited partnership holding a license issued under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due under this chapter, the general partners, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility of supervising the preparation of the returns and payment of the tax are personally liable for the partnership’s failure. The dissolution of a limited liability limited partnership does not discharge a general partner’s liability for a prior failure of the partnership to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the general partners elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability limited partnership must make a cash deposit or post with the commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual special fuels tax liability of the limited liability limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 443, § 37.

57-43.2-17.
Fraudulent return. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-18.
Distribution of tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-19.
Transfer, deposit, and distribution of funds. [Effective through June 30, 2025]

All taxes, license fees, penalties, and interest collected under this chapter must be transferred to the state treasurer who shall deposit moneys in the highway tax distribution fund. The highway tax distribution fund must be distributed in the manner as prescribed by section 54-27-19.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 52; 2009, ch. 573, § 1; 2013, ch. 43, § 15; 2015, ch. 42, §§ 6, 7, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 7, § 6, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 33, § 6, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 8, § 9, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by section 7 of chapter 42, S.L. 2015, extended the effective date from July 1, 2015 to July 1, 2019.

57-43.2-19.
Transfer, deposit, and distribution of funds. [Effective July 1, 2025]

All taxes, license fees, penalties, and interest collected under this chapter must be transferred to the state treasurer who shall deposit moneys in a highway tax distribution fund, except all special fuels excise taxes collected on sales of diesel fuel to a railroad under section 57-43.2-03 of up to two hundred ninety-seven thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars per year must be transferred to the state treasurer who shall deposit the moneys in the rail safety fund. The highway tax distribution fund must be distributed in the manner as prescribed by section 54-27-19.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 52; 2009, ch. 573, § 1; 2013, ch. 43, § 15; 2015, ch. 42, §§ 6, 7, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 7, § 6, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 33, § 6, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 8, § 9, effective July 1, 2021.

57-43.2-20.
Erroneously or illegally collected taxes.

If any taxes, penalties, or interest imposed by this chapter have been erroneously or illegally collected from any person, the commissioner may permit that person to take credit against a subsequent tax return for the amount of the erroneous or illegal overpayment. In the alternative, the commissioner shall present a voucher to the office of management and budget for payment of the amount erroneously or illegally collected and a warrant-check must be prepared by that office drawn on the state treasurer payable to that person. The refund must be paid from undistributed funds received from the tax imposed by this chapter and any such refund may not be approved or paid unless it is in an amount which is in excess of five dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 53.

57-43.2-21.
Inventory gains — Losses.

A supplier or distributor shall take a physical inventory reading of all special fuel located in a terminal, underground tank, aboveground tank, railcar, storage tank of a truck, and the storage tank of a bulk delivery truck on a monthly basis and shall report the physical readings, inventory gains, and inventory losses to the commissioner. The inventory reconciliation must include special fuel at retail locations and special fuel stored in a barrel, drum, or other receptacle.

When sold or used by a supplier or distributor, a gain in special fuel inventories is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter in the same manner as special fuel purchased, imported, or otherwise acquired.

A supplier or distributor who experiences an actual physical inventory loss due to shrinkage or evaporation is responsible for the tax imposed by this chapter on any loss in excess of two percent of liquefied petroleum gases and one-half of one percent of all other special fuel received during the period covered by the inventory reconciliation.

For the purposes of this chapter, it is presumed that all special fuel received above these allowances, except that gallonage shown as actual inventory based on physical inventory readings at the end of the time period covered by the inventory reconciliation, and other allowances provided in this chapter, has been sold, delivered, or used, and the supplier or distributor is liable for the amount of the special fuel tax on each gallon [3.79 liters] of special fuel not accounted for. For purposes of this chapter, special fuel refined at a refinery in this state and placed in storage at the refinery, and special fuel brought into the state by pipeline and placed in storage at a pipeline terminal, is not deemed received until it is withdrawn from the refinery or terminal storage for sale or use in this state, or for shipment or delivery to destinations in this state.

The commissioner may allow a tax credit to a supplier or distributor for actual inventory losses due to casualty loss subject to the discretion of the commissioner and based on proof of the loss as required by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 657, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 54; 1999, ch. 528, § 5; 2007, ch. 539, § 4.

57-43.2-22.
Administration — Assistance authorized — Rules.

The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner may employ assistance and conduct investigations as may be necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and may adopt and enforce reasonable rules relating to the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 722, § 11; 1999, ch. 526, § 55.

57-43.2-23.
Violations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-24.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-25.
Liquefied petroleum gas dealers — License — Fee — Permits — Bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-26.
Levy of importer for use tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-27.
Computation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-28.
Exemptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-29.
Importer for use license required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-30.
Issuance and display. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-31.
Assignment forbidden. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-32.
Revocation, cancellation, and surrender of importer for use license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-33.
Occasional trip permits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-34.
Authorization of the commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 564, § 7.

57-43.2-35.
Credit for North Dakota purchases — Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-35.1.
Credit for taxes paid on worthless accounts and refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-36.
Importer for use tax reports, payments, records, penalties, disposition of funds, audits, and assessments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.2-37.
Cooperative special fuels agreements.

The director may enter cooperative agreements for exchange of information and auditing of users of special fuels used in fleets of motor vehicles operated or intended to operate interstate or internationally. An agreement or amendment to an agreement is not effective until filed in writing with the director.

An agreement under this section may provide for determining the base for users, users’ records requirements, audit procedures, exchange of information, persons eligible for tax licensing, defining qualified motor vehicles, determining if bonding is required, specifying reporting requirements and periods including defining the uniform penalty and interest rates for late reporting, determining methods for collecting and forwarding of special fuel taxes and penalties to another jurisdiction, and other provisions as will facilitate the administration of the agreement.

The director may, as required by the terms of the agreement, forward information in the director’s or commissioner’s possession relative to the manufacture, receipt, sale, use, transportation, or shipment of special fuels by any person. The director may disclose the location of officers, motor vehicles, and other real and personal property of users of special fuels.

An agreement may provide for audits of users of special fuels used in fleets of motor vehicles operated or intended to operate interstate or internationally, to determine if the special fuel taxes due are properly reported and paid. The findings of audits performed on persons that have a taxable use of special fuels may be shared among parties to a cooperative agreement. For persons not based in this state and who have taxable use of special fuel in this state, the director or the commissioner may serve the audit findings, in the form of an assessment, on the person as though an audit was conducted by the director or the commissioner.

Any agreement entered under this section does not preclude the director or the commissioner from auditing the records of any person covered by the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of any agreement entered into under this section prevail over any conflicting rules adopted by the director or the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 24; 2011, ch. 72, § 8.

57-43.2-38.
Special fuel tax for interstate motor carriers — Computation — Credits — Refunds.

An interstate motor carrier importing special fuel into this state is subject to the special fuel tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02 on the number of gallons [liters] of fuel used in the state to propel licensed motor vehicles upon the public roads or highways in the state.

The amount of fuel used in interstate fleet operations by a motor carrier is determined by using a factor, the numerator of which is the total miles [kilometers] operated in this state and the denominator of which is the total miles [kilometers] operated both within and without this state applied to the total of that fuel used both within and without this state.

An interstate motor carrier is eligible for tax credits or tax refunds at the times and in the manner prescribed by a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.2-37.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 56.

57-43.2-39.
Interstate motor carrier required to obtain license — Display — Revocation or cancellation of license — Occasional trip permits in lieu of license.

An interstate motor carrier shall apply to the director for a license subject to the requirements of a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.2-37 and is required to display the license in a manner prescribed under the terms of the agreement.

The license issued to an interstate motor carrier is not a franchise or irrevocable and it may not be assigned or transferred.

The director shall issue a license to an interstate motor carrier based on the terms of the cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.2-37 and the license shall be in force until it is suspended, revoked, surrendered, or expires pursuant to the terms of the agreement.

An interstate motor carrier who makes only occasional trips into or through this state may elect to secure occasional trip permits in lieu of the license required by this section. The term “occasional” means no more than one trip into or through the state in any seventy-two-hour period. The commissioner, director, or an agent of the commissioner or director shall issue an occasional trip permit for a fee of fifteen dollars per trip pursuant to regulations and procedures prescribed by the commissioner or director.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 57.

57-43.2-40.
Interstate motor carrier tax reports — Payments — Audits — Assessments.

An interstate motor carrier shall file a tax report with the director and remit to the director any taxes, penalties, and interest due at the time and in the manner prescribed by the terms of a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.2-37. All moneys collected and received under this section must be transmitted monthly by the director to the state treasurer to be transferred and credited in the same manner as provided in section 57-43.2-19.

An interstate motor carrier shall obtain, create, maintain, and retain records as required by the terms of a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.2-37 and make those records available to the director or the commissioner for examination.

The director or commissioner shall audit the records of an interstate motor carrier at the times and in the manner prescribed by a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.2-37.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 58.

57-43.2-41.
Dyed special fuel — Administrative fees — Inspections — Penalty — Consumer advisory.

Special fuel dyed for federal motor fuel tax exemption purposes is subject to the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-03 and, unless otherwise provided in this section, may not be used in the fuel supply tank of a licensed motor vehicle. The owner or operator of a licensed motor vehicle found to contain dyed special fuel in the fuel supply tank of that vehicle is subject to the tax imposed by section 57-43.2-02 to be determined based on the capacity of the fuel supply tank of the licensed vehicle involved and is subject to administrative fees as follows:

A five hundred dollar fee for the first violation.

A two thousand dollar fee for a second violation occurring within three years of a previous violation.

A four thousand dollar fee for a third violation occurring within three years of two previous violations.

A ten thousand dollar fee for the fourth and subsequent violations occurring within three years of three or more previous violations.

Special fuel found in the fuel supply tank of a licensed motor vehicle shall be considered dyed if the fuel contains traces of the dye in an amount sufficient to be found in violation of federal laws and rules.

For purposes of enforcing the provisions of this section, the highway patrol, by agreement with the commissioner, may:

Stop, detain, and inspect a licensed motor vehicle and withdraw a sample of fuel from the fuel supply tank of the vehicle in a manner and in a quantity sufficient to determine whether the fuel is a special fuel and to determine the dye content of the fuel.

Physically inspect, examine, or otherwise search any tank, reservoir, or other container that can or may be used for the production, storage, or transportation of any type of fuel for coloration, markers, and shipping papers.

The highway patrol may issue a citation covering any violation of this section, and the person receiving a citation has the right to a hearing before the tax commissioner in the manner provided in chapter 28-32 if, within thirty days after receiving a citation, the person requests a hearing.

This section does not apply to:

A person who purchased dyed special fuel in another state or Canadian province and imported that fuel into the state in the supply tank of a licensed motor vehicle provided the state or Canadian province where the fuel was purchased does not prohibit its use in that vehicle.

A state or local government using dyed special fuel in licensed vehicles for purposes of construction, reconstruction, repair, or maintenance of public roads or highways.

All administrative fees or civil penalties under this section may be completely or partially waived by the tax commissioner for good cause shown, and any fees or penalties not waived must be collected by the tax commissioner and transferred to the state treasurer and deposited in the state highway fund.

The tax commissioner shall prescribe the size and contents of a sticker to be affixed to pumps dispensing dyed special fuel to advise consumers of the administrative fee imposed for a first violation of this section for use of dyed special fuel in the fuel supply tank of a licensed motor vehicle. A retailer of dyed special fuel shall affix the prescribed sticker to every pump on the retailer’s premises dispensing dyed special fuel.

Any attempt by a person to prevent, stop, or delay an inspection of fuel or shipping papers by the highway patrol is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars per occurrence.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 528, § 6; 2013, ch. 470, § 1.